Utah statutes.
53A-8a-703.   Compensation of school and district administrators.

(1)  Beginning no later than the 2015-16 school year, a school or district administrator's salary shall be based on the school or district administrator's most recent evaluation.

(2)  A school district shall continue each year to award any salary increases to a school or district administrator based on an evaluation administered pursuant to Section 53A-8a-702 until at least 15% of a school or district administrator's salary is contingent upon the evaluation administered pursuant to Section 53A-8a-702.

